California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
None of the provisions of this article or of Section 825 shall apply to the expenditure of either state or federal funds necessary to replace or reconstruct any state highway damaged or destroyed as the result of disaster over a wide area, such as by enemy action, sabotage, floods, hurricanes, tidal waves, earthquakes, severe storms, or other catastrophes where, at the time of the catastrophe, the Governor declared an emergency, and where such expenditure is authorized pursuant to this section by the commission by resolution, and such resolution is approved by the Governor. In the event the funds expended for replacing or reconstructing the damaged or destroyed state highway exceeds the cost of providing a facility of equal utility with that damaged or destroyed as determined by the director, he shall report the amount of such excess to the commission, and any expenditure in excess of the cost of providing a facility of equal utility shall be subject to all the provisions of this article and Section 825.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

188.3.

The cost of maintenance of all toll bridges under the jurisdiction of the commission shall be paid out of money in the State Highway Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

188.4.

(a) Maintenance expenditures on all toll facilities owned by the state shall, for accounting purposes, be classified as Category A or Category B expenditures. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the cost of maintenance of toll facilities in the geographic jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall be paid in accordance with the following:

(1) Category A maintenance shall be paid from the State Highway Account and shall include all normal highway maintenance which would be performed by the state according to state procedures as if the facility was a toll-free state facility.

(2) Category B maintenance shall be paid from toll revenues and shall include all maintenance and reconstruction work of those facilities such as toll facility administration buildings and toll booths which are constructed primarily for the purpose of collecting tolls.

(b) In no event shall the Category A maintenance expenditures for the toll bridges in the geographic jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission be funded at a lower percentage than was established in accordance with procedures for funding Category A maintenance of the toll bridges during the 1986–87 fiscal year.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), for each toll bridge specified in Section 30910, maintenance expenditures shall be funded from toll revenues. However, for a toll bridge that is part of the program specified in Section 188.5, maintenance expenditures shall be funded from toll revenues commencing with the completion of the seismic retrofit or replacement work on that bridge as described in Section 188.5. For the purposes of this subdivision, until the obligations of the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank secured by the seismic retrofit surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31010 are no longer outstanding, as that term is defined in the constituent instruments defining the rights of the holders of those obligations, the term “toll revenues” shall not include the seismic retrofit surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31010, and the seismic retrofit surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31010 shall remain pledged to the payment of obligations incurred by the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank under Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 31070). Maintenance expenses that are required to be funded with toll revenues and that would otherwise constitute Category A maintenance expenditures shall be funded from toll revenues remaining after provision is made for payment of all obligations secured by the lien on toll revenues created by subdivision (b) of Section 30960.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 1.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

188.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The department has determined that in order to provide maximum safety for the traveling public and to ensure continuous and unimpeded operation of the state’s transportation network, six state-owned toll bridges are in need of a seismic safety retrofit, and one state-owned toll bridge is in need of a partial retrofit and a partial replacement.

(2) The bridges identified by the department as needing seismic retrofit are the Benicia-Martinez Bridge, the Carquinez Bridge, the Richmond-San Rafael Bridge, the San Mateo-Hayward Bridge, the San Pedro-Terminal
 Island Bridge (also known as the Vincent Thomas Bridge), the San Diego-Coronado Bridge, and the west span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge. The department has also identified the east span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge as needing to be replaced. That replacement span will be safer, stronger, longer lasting, and more cost efficient to maintain than completing a seismic retrofit for the current east span.

(3) The south span of the Carquinez Bridge is to be replaced pursuant to Regional Measure 1, as described in Section 30917.

(4) The cost estimate to retrofit the state-owned toll bridges and to replace the east span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge is four billion six hundred thirty-seven million dollars ($4,637,000,000), as follows:

(A) The Benicia-Martinez Bridge retrofit is one hundred
 ninety million dollars ($190,000,000).

(B) The north span of the Carquinez Bridge retrofit is one hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000).

(C) The Richmond-San Rafael Bridge retrofit is six hundred sixty-five million dollars ($665,000,000).

(D) The San Mateo-Hayward Bridge retrofit is one hundred ninety million dollars ($190,000,000).

(E) The San Pedro-Terminal Island Bridge retrofit is sixty-two million dollars ($62,000,000).

(F) The San Diego-Coronado Bridge retrofit is one hundred five million dollars ($105,000,000).

(G) The west span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge retrofit, as a lifeline bridge, is
 seven hundred million dollars ($700,000,000).

(H) Replacement of the east span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge is two billion six hundred million dollars ($2,600,000,000).

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the following amounts from the following funds shall be allocated until expended, for the seismic retrofit or replacement of state-owned toll bridges:

(1) Six hundred fifty million dollars ($650,000,000) from the 1996 Seismic Retrofit Account in the Seismic Retrofit Bond Fund of 1996 for the seven state-owned toll bridges identified by the department as requiring seismic safety retrofit or replacement.

(2) One hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000) in surplus revenues generated under the Seismic Retrofit Bond Act of 1996 that
 are in excess of the amount actually necessary to complete Phase Two of the state’s seismic retrofit program. These excess funds shall be reallocated to assist in financing seismic retrofit of the state-owned toll bridges.

(3) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) from the Vincent Thomas Toll Bridge Revenue Account.

(4) The funds necessary to meet both of the following:

(A) A principal obligation of two billion two hundred eighty-two million dollars ($2,282,000,000) from the seismic retrofit surcharge, including any interest therefrom, imposed pursuant to Section 31010, subject to the limitation set forth in subdivision (c) and subdivision (b) of Section 31010.

(B) All costs of financing, including capitalized interest, reserves, costs of issuance,
 costs of credit enhancements and any other financial products necessary or desirable in connection therewith, and any other costs related to financing.

(5) Thirty-three million dollars ($33,000,000) from the San Diego-Coronado Toll Bridge Revenue Fund.

(6) Not less than seven hundred forty-five million dollars ($745,000,000) from the State Highway Account to be used toward the eight hundred seventy-five million dollars ($875,000,000) state contribution, to be achieved as follows:

(A) (i) Two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) to be appropriated for the state-local transportation partnership program described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (d) of Section 164, prior to its repeal by Chapter 622 of the Statutes of 1997, for the 1998–99 fiscal year.

(ii) The remaining funds intended for that program and any program savings to be made available for toll bridge seismic retrofit.

(B) A reduction of not more than seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) in the funding level specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 164, prior to its repeal by Chapter 622 of the Statutes of 1997, for traffic system management.

(C) Three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) in accumulated savings by the department achieved from better efficiency and lower costs.

(7) Not more than one hundred thirty million dollars ($130,000,000) from the Transit Capital Improvement Program funded by the Public Transportation Account in the State Transportation Fund to be used toward the eight hundred seventy-five million
 dollars ($875,000,000) state contribution. If the contribution in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) exceeds three hundred seventy million dollars ($370,000,000), it is the intent that the amount from the Transit Capital Improvement Program shall be reduced by an amount that is equal to that excess.

(8) (A) The funds necessary to meet principal obligations of not less than six hundred forty-two million dollars ($642,000,000) from the state’s share of the federal Highway Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation (HBRR) Program.

(B) If the project costs exceed four billion six hundred thirty-seven million dollars ($4,637,000,000), the department may program not more than four hundred forty-eight million dollars ($448,000,000) in project savings or other available resources from the Interregional Transportation Improvement Program, the State Highway Operation and
 Protection Program, or federal bridge funds for that purpose.

(C) None of the funds identified in subparagraph (B) may be expended for any purpose other than the conditions and design features described in paragraph (9).

(9) The estimated cost of replacing the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge listed in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) is based on the following conditions:

(A) The new bridge shall be located north adjacent to the existing bridge and shall be the Replacement Alternative N-6 (preferred) Suspension Structure Variation, as specified in the Final Environmental Impact Statement, dated May 1, 2001, submitted by the department to the Federal Highway Administration.

(B) The main span of the bridge shall be in the form of a
 single tower cable suspension design and shall be the Replacement Alternative N-6 (preferred) Suspension Structure Variation, as specified in the Final Environmental Impact Statement, dated May 1, 2001, submitted by the department to the Federal Highway Administration.

(C) The roadway in each direction shall consist of five lanes, each lane will be 12 feet wide, and there shall be 10-foot shoulders as an emergency lane for public safety purposes on each side of the main-traveled way.

(c) If the actual cost of retrofit or replacement, or both retrofit and replacement, of toll bridges is less than the cost estimate of four billion six hundred thirty-seven million dollars ($4,637,000,000), there shall be a reduction in the amount provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) equal to the proportion of total funds committed to complete the projects funded from funds generated from
 paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) as compared to the total funds from paragraphs (6), (7), and (8) of subdivision (b), and there shall be a proportional reduction in the amount specified in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b).

(d) If the department determines that the actual costs exceed the amounts identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (b), the department shall report to the Legislature within 90 days from the date of that determination as to the difference and the reason for the increase in costs.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall adopt fund estimates consistent with subdivision (b) and Section 188.6 and provide flexibility so that state funds can be made available to match federal funds made available to regional transportation planning agencies.

(f) For the
 purposes of this section, “principal obligations” are the amount of funds generated, either in cash, obligation authority, or the proceeds of a bond or other indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 536, Sec. 11.   (AB 957)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

188.51.

(a) If the department utilizes its authority under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 14550) of Part 5.3 of Division 3 of the Government Code to issue federal highway grant anticipation notes (GARVEE Bonds) from the state share of federal obligation authority to fund the projects identified in subdivision (a) of Section 188.5, Section 14553.6 of the Government Code shall not apply.

(b) State expenditures for the purposes of subdivision (a) shall not exceed 5 percent of the annual amount of federal obligation authority received by the state for a period determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 907, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

188.53.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is the intent of the Legislature that the programming authorization described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 188.5 is available for any and all state-owned toll bridge retrofit projects identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 188.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 5.1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

188.6.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that on August 16, 2004, the department reported to the Legislature that the funds identified in Section 188.5 are insufficient to complete the state toll bridge seismic retrofit program, including the replacement of the east span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge, due to cost overruns for the program now estimated at three billion six hundred million dollars ($3,600,000,000).

(2) By enacting this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to identify additional funds from various sources, as described in subdivision (b), in order to fund this shortfall and so that the toll bridge seismic retrofit and replacement program, as described in Section 188.5, as that section read on January 1, 2005, may proceed to completion without further costly delay.

(b) The following amounts from the following funds shall be allocated until expended in order to eliminate the shortfall identified in subdivision (a) and to complete the seismic retrofit or replacement of state-owned toll bridges as expeditiously as possible:

(1) Not less than two billion one hundred fifty million dollars ($2,150,000,000) from the Bay Area Toll Account, derived from an additional one dollar ($1) surcharge on the state-owned toll bridges within the geographic jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission to be effective no sooner than January 1, 2007.

(2) Not less than eight hundred twenty million dollars ($820,000,000) for the seismic retrofit or replacement of the state-owned toll bridges in the geographic jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission made available through the consolidation of all toll revenues under the management of the Bay Area Toll Authority and from the authorization for the authority to refinance debt secured by toll revenues.

(3) The amount of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) to fund the cost of demolition of the existing east span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge from funding sources supporting the state highway operations and protection program, from available state resources from transportation project savings, or from the federal Highway Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Program.

(4) The amount of three hundred thirty million dollars ($330,000,000) from the following accounts:

(A) One hundred thirty million dollars ($130,000,000) from the State Highway Account from accumulated savings by the department achieved from better efficiency, operational savings, and lower costs.

(B) One hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000) of any excess funds that would otherwise have been transferred in the 2006–07 fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7102 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as amended by Chapter 76 of the Statutes of 2005, shall instead be transferred to the Bay Area Toll Account and are hereby appropriated to the department for the purposes of this section. If sufficient funds are not available from this source for this purpose during the 2006–07 fiscal year, the funding required under this paragraph shall be made available from additional accumulated savings by the department achieved from better efficiency, operational savings, or lower costs pursuant to subparagraph (A), or from the federal Highway Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Program or the State Highway Account, as determined by the department in consultation with, and with approval of, the California Transportation Commission.

(C) Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) from the fund reserve in the Motor Vehicle Account for the 2005–06 fiscal year, which is hereby appropriated.

(c) If the amount of the overruns estimated by the department, as described in subdivision (a), is less than three billion six hundred million dollars ($3,600,000,000), the savings shall be shared between the state and the authority in the same proportion as their proportional contribution to the estimated cost overruns, as provided in paragraphs (1), (3), and (4) of subdivision (b).

(d) If the actual amount of the overruns exceeds the amount estimated by the department, as described in subdivision (a), the authority shall utilize funds generated under the powers granted to it in Sections 30886, 30950.2, 30954, 30961, and 31011 to provide additional financial resources to complete the state toll bridge seismic retrofit program.

(e) Funds made available under this section and Section 188.5 for the replacement of the east span of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge shall only be expended for the structure described in paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) of Section 188.5 as that section read on January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 375) by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 639.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

188.61.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that in order to provide maximum safety for the traveling public and to ensure continuous and unimpeded operation of the state’s transportation network, the Antioch Bridge and the Dumbarton Bridge are each in need of a seismic safety retrofit.

(b) The Antioch Bridge and the Dumbarton Bridge are hereby deemed to be part of the state toll bridge seismic retrofit program described in Section 188.5. Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 188.6 or any other provision of law, the cost overrun savings described in that subdivision shall not be shared between the state and the Bay Area Toll Authority, but shall instead be transferred to the Bay Area Toll Account, and are hereby appropriated to the authority for
 expenditure on the Antioch Bridge and the Dumbarton Bridge seismic safety retrofit projects. All other funds required to complete the Antioch Bridge and the Dumbarton Bridge seismic safety retrofit projects shall be provided by the authority. The authority may increase the amount of the tolls collected on the toll bridges described in Section 30910 pursuant to Sections 30918 and 31011 for the purpose of completing these projects.

(c) All of the requirements of Sections 30952.05, 30952.1, 30952.2, and 30952.3 shall also be applied to the seismic retrofit of the Antioch Bridge and the Dumbarton Bridge. The Toll Bridge Program Oversight Committee, established by Section 30952.1, shall have project oversight and control responsibilities for these projects to the same extent as for the Benicia-Martinez Bridge project. 

(d) All maintenance expenditures required to be funded by Section
 188.4 with authority toll revenues shall be funded from toll revenues remaining after provision is made for payment of all obligations of the authority that are secured by a pledge of toll revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 515, Sec. 2.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

188.62.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby continuously appropriated to the department for expenditure all amounts paid to the department by the Bay Area Toll Authority for the planning, design, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, and seismic retrofit of the state-owned toll bridges specified in Section 30910 pursuant to the state toll bridge seismic retrofit program or any other program of the authority, including, without limitation, amounts paid to the department as advances or to reimburse the department for payments to contractors working on the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 515, Sec. 3.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

188.7.

Any expenses incurred in connection with any state highway under Article 4 (commencing with Section 2760) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 2780) of Chapter 5 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code shall be paid from money in the State Highway Account available for the construction of state highways, but such expenditures shall not be subject to Sections 188 and 188.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

188.8.

(a) From the funds programmed pursuant to Section 188 for regional improvement projects, the commission shall approve programs and program amendments, so that funding is distributed to each county of County Group No. 1 and in each county of County Group No. 2 during the county share periods commencing July 1, 1997, and ending June 30, 2004, and each period of four years thereafter. The amount shall be computed as follows:

(1) The commission shall compute, for the county share periods all of the money to be expended for regional improvement projects in County Groups Nos. 1 and 2, respectively, as provided in Section 188.

(2) From the amount computed for County Group No. 1 in paragraph (1) for the county
 share periods the commission shall determine the amount of programming for each county in the group based on a formula that is based 75 percent on the population of the county to the total population of County Group No. 1 and 25 percent on state highway miles in the county to the total state highway miles in County Group No. 1.

(3) From the amount computed for County Group No. 2 in paragraph (1) for the county share periods the commission shall determine the amount of programming for each county in the group based on a formula that is based 75 percent on the population of the county to the total population of County Group No. 2 and 25 percent on state highway miles in the county to the total state highway miles in County Group No. 2.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), that portion of the county population and state highway mileage in El Dorado and Placer Counties that is
 included within the jurisdiction of the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency shall be counted separately toward the area under the jurisdiction of the Tahoe Regional Transportation Agency and may not be included in El Dorado and Placer Counties. The commission shall approve programs, program amendments, and fund reservations for the area under the jurisdiction of the Tahoe Regional Transportation Agency that shall be calculated using the formula described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) A transportation planning agency designated pursuant to Section 29532 of the Government Code, or a county transportation commission created by Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000) of the Public Utilities Code, may adopt a resolution to pool its county share programming with any county or counties adopting similar resolutions to consolidate its county shares for two consecutive county share periods into a single share covering both periods. A
 multicounty transportation planning agency with a population of less than three million may also adopt a resolution to pool the share of any county or counties within its region. The resolution shall provide for pooling the county share programming in any of the pooling counties for the new single share period and shall be submitted to the commission not later than May 1 immediately preceding the commencement of the county share period.

(d) For the purposes of this section, funds programmed shall include the following costs pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14529 of the Government Code:

(1) The amounts programmed or budgeted for both components of project development in the original programmed year.

(2) The amount programmed for right-of-way and right-of-way support costs in the year programmed in the most
 recent state transportation improvement program. If the final estimate is greater than 120 percent or less than 80 percent of the amount originally programmed, the amount shall be adjusted for final expenditure estimates at the time of right-of-way certification.

(3) The engineer’s final estimate of project costs, including construction support, presented to the commission for approval pursuant to Section 14533 of the Government Code in the year programmed in the most recent state transportation improvement program. If the construction contract award amount is less than 80 percent of the engineer’s final estimate, excluding construction support, the department shall notify the commission and the commission may adjust its project allocation accordingly.

(4) Project costs shown in the program, as amended, where project allocations have not yet been approved by the commission,
 escalated to the date of scheduled project delivery.

(e) Project costs shown in the program may not be changed to reflect any of the following:

(1) Differences that are within 20 percent of the amount programmed for actual project development cost.

(2) Differences that are within 20 percent of the amount reported at the time of allocation pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) for actual right-of-way costs calculated at the time of acceptance of a project construction contract.

(3) Construction contract award amounts, except when those amounts are less than 80 percent of the engineer’s final estimate, excluding construction support, and the commission has adjusted the project construction allocation.

(4) Changes in construction expenditures, except for supplemental project allocations made by the commission, including supplemental allocations made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 188.9.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the population in each county is that determined by the last preceding federal census, or a subsequent census validated by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance, at the beginning of each county share period.

(g) For the purposes of this section, “state highway miles” means the miles of state highways open to vehicular traffic at the beginning of each county share period.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that there is to be flexibility in programming under this section and Section 188 so that, while
 ensuring that each county will receive an equitable share of state transportation improvement program funding, the types of projects selected and the programs from which they are funded may vary from county to county.

(i) Commencing with the four-year period commencing on July 1, 2004, individual county share shortfalls and surpluses at the end of each four-year period, if any, shall be carried forward and credited or debited to the following four years.

(j) The commission, with the consent of the department, may consider programming projects in the state transportation improvement program in a county with a population of not more than 1,000,000 at a level higher or lower than the county share, when the regional agency either asks to reserve part or all of the county’s share until a future programming year, to build up a larger share for a higher cost project, or asks to advance
 an amount of the share, in an amount not to exceed 200 percent of the county’s current share, for a larger project, to be deducted from shares for future programming years. After consulting with the department, the commission may adjust the level of programming in the regional program in the affected region against the level of interregional programming in the improvement program to accomplish the reservation or advancement, for the current state transportation improvement program. The commission shall keep track of any resulting shortfalls or surpluses in county shares.

(k) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in a region defined by Section 66502 of the Government Code, the transportation planning agency may adopt a resolution to pool the county share of any county or counties within the region, if each county receives no less than 85 percent and not more than 115 percent of its county share for a single county share period and 100 percent of its
 county share over two consecutive county share periods. The resolution shall be submitted to the commission not later than May 1, immediately preceding the commencement of the county share period.

(l) Federal funds used for federal demonstration projects that use federal obligational authority otherwise available for other projects shall be subtracted from the county share of the county where the project is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 139.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

188.9.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2013, the commission shall allocate construction support costs for a project in the state transportation improvement program at the time of allocation of construction capital costs.

(b) The commission shall require a supplemental project allocation request for a project that experiences construction support costs equal to or greater than 120 percent of the amount originally allocated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 272, Sec. 4.   (SB 1102)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

188.10.

(a) The Toll Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account is hereby created in the State Transportation Fund. The money in the account is hereby appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department for the purpose of funding seismic retrofit or replacement of the bridges listed in Section 188.5. Notwithstanding Section 11012 of the Government Code, the department, in consultation with the Department of Finance and the Office of the State Treasurer, may authorize the investment of bond proceeds or commercial paper proceeds deposited into the account in obligations permitted by the Treasurer. Those invested amounts may be held by a trustee who is either the Treasurer or who is selected by the Treasurer. Authorized investments made pursuant to this section shall be included as cash balance for purposes of reporting the condition of the account in the Governor’s proposed budget or pursuant to the reporting requirement contained in subdivision (b) of Section 14556.9 of the Government Code.

(b) The Department of Finance shall provide notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and to the transportation policy committee in each house in the form of a financing plan or pro forma at least 60 days prior to the initial issuance of any commercial paper or the issuance of any bonds for purposes of the toll bridge seismic retrofit program. The financing plan or pro forma shall include all of the following components:

(1) The amount and form of the debt issuance or issuances, the term of the issuance or issuances, repayment and security provisions, the amount and structure of any reserve funds, and all other details of the proposed financing.

(2) All necessary information with respect to the sources and uses of funds to construct the projects identified in the toll bridge seismic retrofit program and the timing of expenditures by each fund source by fiscal year.

(3) An assessment of funding available for the Bay Area Toll Authority for authorized projects as a result of the financing.

(c) The Department of Finance is not required to provide additional notification to the Legislature after meeting the requirements of subdivision (b) unless additional bonds are issued or changes are made to existing bonds that alter the content of the financing plan it submitted under subdivision (b). The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 60 days of the closing of a refunding or an advance refunding of an existing bond but is not required to include this information in its report under subdivision (b).

(d) No interest income earned as a result of investments made pursuant to subdivision (a), or from reserve funds created to support the financing, shall be used to pay project costs that are in excess of four billion six hundred thirty-seven million dollars ($4,637,000,000). No reserve funds, other than a required debt service reserve fund, shall be in place subsequent to the completion of the seismic retrofit projects.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Finance may adjust the budgeting, accounting, and reporting system for the account so that unliquidated encumbrances are not reflected in the fund balance or financial statements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 76, Sec. 8.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

188.11.

(a) The commission, with assistance from the department and regional agencies, shall maintain a long-term balance of shares, shortfalls, and surpluses for regional improvement programs.

(b) The balance shall include all of the following:

(1) Shares from the fund estimate for each state transportation improvement program pursuant to Section 14525 of the Government Code.

(2) Amounts programmed in each state transportation improvement program pursuant to Section 14529 of the Government Code.

(3) Surpluses or shortfalls due to reservations or advancements pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 188.8.

(4) Amounts deducted or added because of changes in project development costs or a cost increase or savings in the final engineering estimate or the final right-of-way certification estimate at the time of allocation for construction, pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 188.8.

(5) Any supplemental project allocations during or following construction, including supplemental allocations made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 188.9.

(6) Amounts deducted or added because of amendments to the state transportation improvement program that add,
 delete, or change the scope and cost of regional improvement projects, pursuant to Section 14531 of the Government Code.

(c) The balance through the preceding fiscal year shall be made available for review by all regional agencies at the time of each fund estimate, and by not later than August 15 of each year.

(d) The commission, through the fund estimate, shall restore for the next state transportation improvement program the interregional improvement program level specified in subdivision (a) of Section 164.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 272, Sec. 5.   (SB 1102)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

188.14.

The department may transfer or loan, or both, funds between the Toll Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account in the State Transportation Fund and the State Highway Account for cash flow purposes to accomplish individual toll bridge seismic requirements. No funds may be transferred or loaned from the State Highway Account to fund any amenity, as defined by Section 31000, or to fund shortages that result from the expenditure of funds from the Toll Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account for amenities.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 327) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 328, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

188.15.

(a) Except as authorized under subdivision (b), toll funds used as a credit toward the nonfederal share of any federal-aid highway project, as authorized under Section 120(j) of Title 23 of the United States Code, or private entity expenditures used for that purpose, as authorized under Section 1217(i) of the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century (P.L. 105-178), may not be used as a credit for any project that is not within the county or counties in which the toll facility is located.

(b) The toll funds and private expenditures described in subdivision (a) may be used as a credit toward a project located outside the county or counties in which the toll facility is located if the department determines that there is no project in the current state transportation improvement program cycle within that county or counties for which the credit may be used.

(c) The department shall do both of the following:

(1) Obtain specific project proposals for use of the credit described in subdivision (a) from the regional transportation planning agencies and county transportation commissions of the county or counties in which the toll facility is located.

(2) Obtain contingency project proposals for use of the credit outside the county or counties in which the toll facility is located, in preparation for the occurrence of the condition described in subdivision (b).

(d) The county share allocations, as computed under Section 188 or 188.8, may not be increased or reduced as a consequence of any toll revenues or private agency expenditures that are utilized under this section as a credit toward the nonfederal share of any federally funded project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 628, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

189.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, State Transportation District 12, consisting of the County of Orange, is hereby created. The district shall have a separate district organization, staff, and facilities in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1050, Sec. 1.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

190.

Each annual proposed budget prepared pursuant to Section 165 shall include the sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), which sum may include federal funds available for grade separation projects, for allocations to grade separation projects, in accordance with Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2450) of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 315, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

191.
